Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201283-1,105.01
Indeterminate sentence; court;
duties; study of offender; when; costs.

Except when a term
of life imprisonment is required by law, in imposing an indeterminate sentence
upon an offender the court shall:

(1) Fix the minimum and maximum limits of the sentence to be served
within the limits provided by law for any class of felony other than a Class
IV felony, except that when a maximum limit of life is imposed by the court
for a Class IB felony, the minimum limit may be any term of years not less
than the statutory mandatory minimum. If the criminal offense is a Class IV
felony, the court shall fix the minimum and maximum limits of the sentence,
but the minimum limit fixed by the court shall not be less than the minimum
provided by law nor more than one-third of the maximum term and the maximum
limit shall not be greater than the maximum provided by law;

(2) Impose a definite term of years, in which event the maximum term
of the sentence shall be the term imposed by the court and the minimum term
shall be the minimum sentence provided by law; or

(3)(a) When the court is of the opinion that imprisonment may be appropriate
but desires more detailed information as a basis for determining the sentence
to be imposed than has been provided by the presentence report required by
section 29-2261, the court shall commit an offender to the Department of Correctional
Services for a period not exceeding ninety days. The department shall conduct
a complete study of the offender during that time, inquiring into such matters
as his or her previous delinquency or criminal experience, social background,
capabilities, and mental, emotional, and physical health and the rehabilitative
resources or programs which may be available to suit his or her needs. By
the expiration of the period of commitment or by the expiration of such additional
time as the court shall grant, not exceeding a further period of ninety days,
the offender shall be returned to the court for sentencing and the court shall
be provided with a written report of the results of the study, including whatever
recommendations the department believes will be helpful to a proper resolution
of the case. After receiving the report and the recommendations, the court
shall proceed to sentence the offender in accordance with any applicable provision
of law. The term of the sentence shall run from the date of original commitment
under this subdivision.

(b) In order to encourage the use of this procedure in appropriate cases,
all costs incurred during the period the offender is held in a state institution
under this subdivision shall be the responsibility of the state and the county
shall be liable only for the cost of delivering the offender to the institution
and the cost of returning him or her to the appropriate court for sentencing
or such other disposition as the court may then deem appropriate.

Laws 1997, LB 364, § 20;

Laws 2002, Third Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 17;

Laws 2011, LB12, § 6.

By their terms, this section and section 29-2204 govern indeterminate sentences, and they are inapplicable to a criminal defendant's determinate sentence. State v. White, 256 Neb. 536, 590 N.W.2d 863 (1999).

Where a criminal statute was amended by mitigating the minimum term of a Class IV felony indeterminate sentence after the defendant committed the crime, but before final judgment was rendered on direct appeal, the punishment was that provided by the amendatory act, since the Legislature did not specifically state otherwise. State v. Urbano, 256 Neb. 194, 589 N.W.2d 144 (1999).